apertium-nld.nld.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzáàäâéëèêíìïîóòöôúùüûñħĊĦġ</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <!-- POS Categories -->
    <sdef n="n" 	c="Noun"/> 
    <sdef n="np" 	c="Proper noun"/> 
    <sdef n="prn" 	c="Pronoun"/> 
    <sdef n="det" 	c="Determiner"/> 
    <sdef n="adj" 	c="Adjective"/> 
    <sdef n="adv" 	c="Adverb"/> 
    <sdef n="preadv" 	c="Pre-adverb"/> 
    <sdef n="pr" 	c="Preposition"/> 
    <sdef n="vbser" 	c="The verb 'to be'"/> 
    <sdef n="vbhaver" 	c="The verb 'to have'"/> 
    <sdef n="vblex" 	c="Lexical verb"/> 
    <sdef n="vaux" 	c="Auxilliary verb"/> 
    <sdef n="vbmod" 	c="Modal verb"/> 
    <sdef n="rel" 	c="Relative"/> 
    <sdef n="num" 	c="Numeral / Number"/> 
    <sdef n="ij" 	c="Interjection"/> 
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" 	c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/> 
    <sdef n="cnjsub" 	c="Subordinating conjunction"/> 
    <sdef n="cnjadv" 	c="Adverbial conjunction"/> 
    <sdef n="atp" 	c="Attachable prefix"/> 
    <!-- POS Subcategories -->
    <!-- Gender -->
    <sdef n="m" 	c="Masculine"/> 
    <sdef n="f" 	c="Feminine"/> 
    <sdef n="nt" 	c="Neuter"/> 
    <sdef n="mf" 	c="Masculine-Feminine"/> 
    <sdef n="mfn" 	c="Masculine/feminine/neuter"/> 
    <!-- Number -->
    <sdef n="sg" 	c="Singular"/> 
    <sdef n="pl" 	c="Plural"/> 
    <sdef n="sp" 	c="Singular / Plural"/> 
    <sdef n="unc" 	c="Uncountable"/> 
    <!-- Case -->
    <sdef n="gen" 	c="Genitive"/> 
    <!-- Person -->
    <sdef n="p1" 	c="First person"/> 
    <sdef n="p2" 	c="Second person"/> 
    <sdef n="p3" 	c="Third person"/> 
    <!-- Verbs -->
    <sdef n="sep" 	c="Seperable verb"/> 
    <sdef n="fs" 	c="Seperable verb in subordinate clause"/> 
    <sdef n="fm" 	c="Seperable verb in main clause"/> 
    <sdef n="pres" 	c="Present indicative"/> 
    <sdef n="prs" 	c="Present subjunctive"/> 
    <sdef n="past" 	c="Past tense"/> 
    <sdef n="pp" 	c="Participle"/> 
    <sdef n="inf" 	c="Infinitive"/> 
    <sdef n="imp" 	c="Imperative"/> 
    <sdef n="pprs" 	c="Present participle"/> 
    <sdef n="ger" 	c="Gerund (verbal noun, in this case)"/> 
    <!-- Proper Nouns -->
    <sdef n="nn" 	c="Inanimate"/> 
    <sdef n="an" 	c="Animate / inanimate"/> 
    <sdef n="aa" 	c="Animate"/> 
    <sdef n="ant" 	c="Antroponym"/> 
    <sdef n="cog" 	c="Cognomen"/> 
    <sdef n="al" 	c="Altres"/> 
    <sdef n="top" 	c="Toponym"/> 
    <sdef n="acr" 	c="Acronym"/> 
    <!-- Adjectives -->
    <sdef n="sint" 	c="Synthetic adjective"/> 
    <sdef n="comp" 	c="Comparative"/> 
    <sdef n="sup" 	c="Superlative"/> 
    <sdef n="part" 	c="Partitive"/> 
    <sdef n="attr" 	c="Attributive"/> 
    <sdef n="pred" 	c="Predicative"/> 
    <sdef n="uninfl" 	c="Uninflected (for use with attr)"/>
    <!-- Other -->
    <sdef n="tn" 	c="Tonico"/> 
    <sdef n="qnt" 	c="Quantifier"/> 
    <sdef n="ord" 	c="Ordinal"/> 
    <sdef n="obj" 	c="Object"/> 
    <sdef n="uns" 	c="unstressed"/> 
    <sdef n="subj" 	c="Subject"/> 
    <sdef n="pro" 	c="Proclitic"/> 
    <!-- Determiners -->
    <sdef n="ind" 	c="Indefinite"/> 
    <sdef n="itg" 	c="Interrogative"/> 
    <sdef n="dem" 	c="Demonstrative"/> 
    <sdef n="def" 	c="Definite"/> 
    <sdef n="pos" 	c="Possessive"/> 
    <sdef n="ref" 	c="Reflexive"/> 
    <!-- Punctuation -->
    <sdef n="sent" 	c="End of sentence"/> 
    <sdef n="cm" 	c="Comma"/> 
    <sdef n="lpar" 	c="Left parenthesis"/> 
    <sdef n="rpar" 	c="Right parenthesis"/> 
    <sdef n="guio" 	c="Hyphen"/> 
    <sdef n="percent" 	c="Percentage"/> 
    <sdef n="apos" 	c="Apostrophe"/> 
    <!-- Compounding -->
    <sdef n="compound-only-L" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="compound-R" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="cmp" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="cmp-split" 	c=""/> 
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>

<!-- SECTION: Punctuation -->

<pardef n="separa">
  <e r="LR"><re>[.\?;:!]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l><a/></l>      <r></r></p><re>[.\?;:!]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="cometa">
  <e>       <re>[’'‘]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="apos"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="guionet">
  <e>       <p><l>-</l>         <r>-<s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="coma">
  <e>       <p><l>,</l>         <r>,<s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="paresq">
  <e>       <re>[\(\[]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="pardret">
  <e>       <re>[\)\]]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="numeros">
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([., ][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ordinals">
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+</re><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+</re><p><l>de</l><r>de<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+</re><p><l>ste</l><r>ste<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<!-- SECTION: Interjections -->

<pardef n="hallo__ij">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="ij"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<!-- SECTION: Prepositions -->

<pardef n="van__pr">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<!-- SECTION: Conjunctions -->

<pardef n="en__cnjcoo">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="omdat__cnjsub">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="dus__cnjadv">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="cnjadv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<!-- SECTION: Determiners -->

<pardef n="een__det">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/de__det">
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>de<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>het</l>       <r>de<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>de<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="d/eze__det">
  <e>       <p><l>eze</l>       <r>eze<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>it</l>        <r>eze<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eze</l>       <r>eze<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="d/ie__det">
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>        <r>ie<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>at</l>        <r>ie<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>        <r>ie<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="mijn__det">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="on/ze__det">
  <e>       <p><l>ze</l>        <r>ze<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ze</l>        <r>ze<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>ze<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="tweede__det">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="sommige__det">
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="binnen">          <i>binnen</i><par n="van__pr"/></e>
<e lm="in">              <i>in</i><par n="van__pr"/></e>
<e lm="na">              <i>na</i><par n="van__pr"/></e>
<e lm="rond">            <i>rond</i><par n="van__pr"/></e>
<e lm="tegen">           <i>tegen</i><par n="van__pr"/></e>
<e lm="behalve voor">    <i>behalve<b/>voor</i><par n="van__pr"/></e>
<e lm="oor">             <i>oor</i><par n="van__pr"/></e>
<e lm="via">             <i>via</i><par n="van__pr"/></e>
<e lm="als wat">         <i>als<b/>wat</i><par n="en__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="echter">          <i>echter</i><par n="en__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="maar">            <i>maar</i><par n="en__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="niettemin">       <i>niettemin</i><par n="en__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="nochtans">        <i>nochtans</i><par n="en__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="daarvoor">        <i>daarvoor</i><par n="dus__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="hoewel">          <i>hoewel</i><par n="dus__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="terwijl">         <i>terwijl</i><par n="dus__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="wanneer">         <i>wanneer</i><par n="dus__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="zo vroeg">        <i>zo<b/>vroeg</i><par n="dus__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="als">             <i>als</i><par n="omdat__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="behalve">         <i>behalve</i><par n="omdat__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="daar">            <i>daar</i><par n="omdat__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="dat">             <i>dat</i><par n="omdat__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="en">              <i>en</i><par n="en__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="hoewel">          <i>hoewel</i><par n="omdat__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="ofschoon">        <i>ofschoon</i><par n="omdat__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="sinds">           <i>sinds</i><par n="dus__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="terwijl">         <i>terwijl</i><par n="en__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="voor">            <i>voor</i><par n="dus__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="zodat">           <i>zodat</i><par n="omdat__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="een">             <i>een</i><par n="een__det"/></e>
<e lm="één">             <i>één</i><par n="een__det"/></e>
<e lm="geen">            <i>geen</i><par n="een__det"/></e>
<e lm="de">              <i></i><par n="/de__det"/></e>
<e lm="die">             <i>d</i><par n="d/ie__det"/></e>
<e lm="deze">            <i>d</i><par n="d/eze__det"/></e>
<e lm="sommige">         <i>sommige</i><par n="sommige__det"/></e>
<e lm="genoeg">          <i>genoeg</i><par n="sommige__det"/></e>
<e lm="vele">            <i>vele</i><par n="sommige__det"/></e>
<e lm="meerdere">        <i>meerdere</i><par n="sommige__det"/></e>
<e lm="jouw">            <i>jouw</i><par n="mijn__det"/></e>
<e lm="uw">              <i>uw</i><par n="mijn__det"/></e>
<e lm="haar">            <i>haar</i><par n="mijn__det"/></e>
<e lm="zijn">            <i>zijn</i><par n="mijn__det"/></e>
<e lm="onze">            <i>on</i><par n="on/ze__det"/></e>
<e lm="jullie">          <i>jullie</i><par n="mijn__det"/></e>
<e lm="hun">             <i>hun</i><par n="mijn__det"/></e>
<e lm="vierde">          <i>vierde</i><par n="tweede__det"/></e>
<e lm="achtste">         <i>achtste</i><par n="tweede__det"/></e>
<e lm="twaalfde">        <i>twaalfde</i><par n="tweede__det"/></e>
<e lm="zestiende">       <i>zestiende</i><par n="tweede__det"/></e>
<e lm="vierentwintigste"><i>vierentwintigste</i><par n="tweede__det"/></e>
<e lm="tachtigste">      <i>tachtigste</i><par n="tweede__det"/></e>
<e lm="Ah">              <i>Ah</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
<e lm="Bah">             <i>Bah</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
<e lm="Goedendag">       <i>Goedendag</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
<e lm="hallo">           <i>hallo</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
<e lm="hè">              <i>hè</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
<e lm="welkom">          <i>welkom</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
<e lm="welkom op">       <i>welkom<b/>op</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="separa"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="numeros"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="cometa"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="ordinals"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="coma"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="guionet"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="paresq"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="pardret"/></e>
